Utah statutes.
78B-15-508.   Genetic testing when specimens not available.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), if a genetic-testing specimen is not available from a man who may be the father of a child, for good cause and under extraordinary circumstances the tribunal considers to be just, the tribunal may order the following individuals to submit specimens for genetic testing:

(a)  the parents of the man;

(b)  brothers and sisters of the man;

(c)  other children of the man and their mothers; and

(d)  other relatives of the man necessary to complete genetic testing.

(2)  Issuance of an order under this section requires a finding that a need for genetic testing outweighs the legitimate interests of the individual sought to be tested.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

